Massachusetts, session 194th, S2560.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Suffolk County Sherriff
shall establish a sick leave bank for Gregory Baker, an employee of the county. Any employee of
the county may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick leave
bank for use by Gregory Baker. If Gregory Baker terminates employment with the county or
requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be
transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be used for
absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the sick leave
bank as determined by the department.
of 1